code/xfst/tr.xfst
! Consonants
define C  b|c|ç|d|f|g|ğ|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|r|s|ş|t|v|y|z;

! Vowels
define V  a|e|i|o|u|ü|ö|ı;

! Orthographic symbols -- all symbols that can appear in words; we omit capitalization.
define O  [C | V];

! Vowel features
define +HIGH i|u|ı|ü; 
define -HIGH e|a|o|ö;
define +LOW a|ö;
define -LOW e|i|ı|o|u|ü;
define +BACK ı|a|o|u;
define -BACK i|e|ö|ü;
define +ROUND ö|ü|o|u;
define -ROUND e|a|i|ı;

define ROOT {ev}|{kolye}|{araba}|{ütü}|{süt}|{korku}|{atom};

define RPlu %+Plu  -> l A r;

define RPoss %+Poss -> S H N;

define RAcc %+Acc ->  Y H;

define RS S -> s || V _ ,, S -> 0 || \V _;

define RA A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || %-BACK C* _ ,, 
          A -> %-HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || %+BACK C* _;

define RH H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %+ROUND] C* _ ,,
          H -> %+HIGH & %+ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %+ROUND] C* _ ,,
          H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %+BACK || [%+BACK & %-ROUND] C* _ ,,
          H -> %+HIGH & %-ROUND & %-BACK || [%-BACK & %-ROUND] C* _ ; 

define RY Y -> 0 || \V _ ,, Y -> y || V _ ;

define RN N -> 0 || _ .#. ,, N -> n || _ ?;

! Morphotactic machine -- read one or more orthographic symbols than you can
! optionally read a Plu, Poss and Acc marker in that order. 
define MAIN  ROOT [%+Plu|0] [%+Poss|0] [%+Acc|0];

read regex MAIN .o. RPlu .o. RA .o. RPoss .o. RS .o. RH .o. RN .o. RAcc .o. RY .o. RH;
